Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 2. Incorporation.

§79-4-2.01.
Incorporators.

One or more persons may act as the incorporator or incorporators of a corporation by delivering articles of incorporation to the Secretary of State for filing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 201, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Articles of incorporation, see § 79-4-202.

Revocation of dissolution, see § 79-4-14.04.

Rights and liabilities of promoters or incorporators inter se under their contracts for issuance of stock to them in return for services. 8 A.L.R.2d 722.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 161, 162.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:14 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 56.

Holmes, The revised Model Business Corporation Act and corporate law reform in Mississippi.
57 Miss. L. J. 271, August, 1987.

§79-4-2.02.
Articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation must set forth:

A corporate name for the corporation that satisfies the requirements of Section 79-4-4.01;

The number of shares the corporation is authorized to issue and any information concerning the authorized shares as required by Section 79-4-6.01;

The street address of the corporation’s initial registered office and the name of its initial registered agent at that office; and

The name and address of each incorporator.

A provision permitting or making obligatory indemnification of a director for liability as defined in Section 79-4-8.50(5) to any person for any action taken, or any failure to take any action, as a director, except liability for:

A provision or reference to a provision in the corporation’s bylaws that requires derivative proceedings under Section 79-4-7.41(1) or any other internal corporate claim that is based upon a current or former director’s or officer’s violation of a duty to be brought in the appropriate court of the county where the corporation’s principal office is located, consistent with applicable law and jurisdictional requirements.

The articles of incorporation may set forth:

The names and addresses of the individuals who are to serve as the initial directors;

Provisions not inconsistent with law regarding:

The purpose or purposes for which the corporation is organized;

Managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation;

Defining, limiting and regulating the powers of the corporation, its board of directors and shareholders; and

A par value for authorized shares or classes of shares;

Any provision that under Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. is required or permitted to be set forth in the bylaws;

A provision eliminating or limiting the liability of a director to the corporation or its shareholders for money damages for any action taken, or any failure to take any action, as a director, except liability for:

The amount of a financial benefit received by a director to which he is not entitled;

An intentional infliction of harm on the corporation or the shareholders;

A violation of Section 79-4-8.33; or

An intentional violation of criminal law; and

Receipt of a financial benefit to which he is not entitled;

An intentional infliction of harm on the corporation or its shareholders;

A violation of Section 79-4-8.33; or

An intentional violation of criminal law.

The articles of incorporation need not set forth any of the corporate powers enumerated in Section 79-4-1.01 et seq.

For the purposes of this section, a “director” shall include any person vested with the discretion or powers of a director under Section 79-4-7.32.

Provisions of the articles of incorporation may be made dependent upon facts objectively ascertainable outside the articles of incorporation in accordance with Section 79-4-1.20(k).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 202; Laws, 1991, ch. 509, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 417, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 459 § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 495, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 25; Laws, 2016, ch. 435, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

The 2004 amendment added (e).

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “information required by Section 79-35-5(a)” for “street address of the corporation’s initial registered office and the name of its initial registered agent at that office” in (a)(3).

Fee for filing articles of incorporation, see § 79-4-1.22.

Absent specified delayed effective date, corporate existence begins upon filing articles of incorporation, see § 79-4-2.03.

Mandatory indemnification, see § 79-4-8.52.

Articles of amendment, see § 79-4-10.06.

Applicability of this section to amendment of articles of incorporation to carry out plan of reorganization ordered or decreed by court, see § 79-4-10.08.

Corporation’s obtaining its articles of incorporation through fraud as ground for judicial dissolution of corporation, see § 79-4-14.30.

Articles of incorporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-137.

Shareholders in bank seeking to enforce an agreement wherein defendant shareholders and certain of the complainants had pledged “individually not to seek control (of the bank) through ownership or control of stock by ourselves or any other person, and by proxy or otherwise” were not entitled to injunction requiring defendant signatories to vote their stock for the reelection of the present bank directors because the usage of the word “individually” in the agreement appeared to conflict with the subsequent phrase “through ownership or control of stock by ourselves or any other person,” and it was not therefore discernable whether the agreement contemplated that no signatory would seek to acquire or hold 51 percent of stock in the corporation or whether the agreement referred to joint action of the signatories; nor was evidence sufficient to justify the issuance of an injunction where there was no proof of resulting injury to the complaining shareholders stemming from the nomination by defendant shareholders of persons other than the present directors; moreover, stipulation of counsel as to who held how many shares of stock in proxy did not indicate that defendants could have succeeded in electing their nominees. Crocker v. Farmers & Merchants Bank, 293 So. 2d 438, 1974 Miss. LEXIS 1794 (Miss. 1974).

A state chartered savings and loan association, by substantial compliance with the provisions of Code 1942, § 5310, obtained a charter amendment, which became effective prior to the effective date of Code 1942, §§ 5288-01 et seq., authorizing it to move its principal office or place of business from North Mississippi Sav. & Loan Asso. v. Confederate States Sav. & Loan Asso., 250 Miss. 463, 166 So. 2d 119, 1964 Miss. LEXIS 475 (Miss. 1964).

Hospital with outstanding capital stock qualifies as a nonprofit corporation able to accept grant for aid from the state inasmuch as in all functions which are part of the state hospital plan, the hospital is in fact and by law, by charter and by its contract with state hospital commission a nonprofit institution under the supervision of the commission and also since the statute recognizes the possibility that there may be outstanding stock in a nonprofit corporation which does not allow any of its profits to inure to the benefit of any shareholder. Craig v. Mercy Hospital-Street Memorial, 209 Miss. 427, 47 So. 2d 867, 1950 Miss. LEXIS 409 (Miss. 1950).

Charter grant of right to stockholders of corporation to change domicile thereof held not violation of statutes or constitution nor inimical to public policy or private right, in view of statute authorizing service on secretary of state of process against corporations failing to file names of agents on whom process may be served. Estes v. Bank of Walnut Grove, 172 Miss. 499, 159 So. 104, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 107 (Miss. 1935).

State may forfeit charter of fraternal corporation soliciting members by falsely representing that they will be received into regular Masonic lodges throughout the United States, and may restrain receiving members by such means pending trial of forfeiture proceedings. Cuney v. State, 142 Miss. 894, 108 So. 298, 1926 Miss. LEXIS 143 (Miss. 1926).

Corporations may be dealt with in a different manner from individuals, their charters being held at the legislative will, subject to amendment or repeal. State v. Jackson Cotton Oil Co., 95 Miss. 6, 48 So. 300, 1909 Miss. LEXIS 209 (Miss. 1909).

The words of a charter are to be considered rather as those of the incorporators than of the state. State ex rel. District Attorney v. Simmons, 70 Miss. 485, 12 So. 477, 1892 Miss. LEXIS 130 (Miss. 1892), limited, Barnes v. Jones, 139 Miss. 675, 103 So. 773, 1925 Miss. LEXIS 115 (Miss. 1925).

Construction and application of provisions of articles, bylaws, statutes, or agreements restricting alienation or transfer of corporate stock.
2 A.L.R.2d 745.

Validity, construction, and effect of articles of incorporation or stock certificates relating to call, redemption, or retirement of common stock. 48 A.L.R.2d 392.

Construction and effect of corporate bylaws or articles relating to change in number of directors.
3 A.L.R.3d 623.

Reinstatement of repealed, forfeited, expired, or suspended corporate charter as validating interim acts of corporation.
42 A.L.R.4th 392.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 78 et seq.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:121 et seq., 74:189 et seq., 74:6121 et seq., 74:1271 et seq., 74:1312 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 101 et seq.

1979 Mississippi Supreme Court Review: Corporate & Commercial Law. 50 Miss. L. J. 741.

§79-4-2.03.
Incorporation.

Unless a delayed effective date is specified, the corporate existence begins when the articles of incorporation are filed.

The Secretary of State’s filing of the articles of incorporation is conclusive proof that the incorporators satisfied all conditions precedent to incorporation except in a proceeding by the state to cancel or revoke the incorporation or involuntarily dissolve the corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 2.03, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Articles of incorporation content, see § 79-4-2.02.

Unless otherwise provided in articles of incorporation, corporation has perpetual duration and succession in its corporate name, see § 79-4-302.

An agricultural co-operative association organized under the act of Congress ( 7 USCS §§ 291,
292) authorizing the formation of such associations for the sole purpose of providing marketing facilities and sales services to growers of cotton, is not a “corporation for profit,” within the meaning of the state statute, where the association, the stock of which is owned exclusively by regional and state co-operative associations, itself derives no profit from its activities, and in fact is expressly referred to in the act of Congress as being “not for profit,” and, although it is authorized to pay dividends on its preferred stock, this stock is simply for use in borrowing money from a governmental agency.
American Cotton Co-op. Ass'n v. Union Compress & Warehouse Co., 193 Miss. 43, 7 So. 2d 537, 1942 Miss. LEXIS 81 (Miss. 1942).

Incorporators who, following the issuance of a certificate of incorporation but prior to the payment into the treasury of the corporation of the required $1,000 as consideration for the issuance of shares, executed, as officers of the corporation, its note for $25,000, were not individually on the corporation’s note. In re Estate of Hardin, 218 So. 2d 889, 1969 Miss. LEXIS 1634 (Miss. 1969).

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 74.

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 109.

§79-4-2.04.
Liability of preincorporation transactions.

All persons purporting to act as or on behalf of a corporation, knowing there was no incorporation under Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq., are jointly and severally liable for all liabilities created while so acting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 2.04, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Liability for purporting to act for corporation prior to incorporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-141.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 187.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 95-98.

§79-4-2.05.
Organization of corporation.

After incorporation:

If initial directors are named in the articles of incorporation, the initial directors shall hold an organizational meeting, at the call of a majority of the directors, to complete the organization of the corporation by appointing officers, adopting bylaws and carrying on any other business brought before the meeting.

If initial directors are not named in the articles, the incorporator or incorporators shall hold an organizational meeting at the call of a majority of the incorporators:

To elect directors and complete the organization of the corporation; or

To elect a board of directors who shall complete the organization of the corporation.

Action required or permitted by Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. to be taken by incorporators at an organizational meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action taken is evidenced by one or more written consents describing the action taken and signed by each incorporator.

An organizational meeting may be held in or out of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 2.05, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Bylaws, see § 79-4-2.06.

Organization of corporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-143.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 184 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 828-833.

§79-4-2.06.
Bylaws.

The incorporators or board of directors of a corporation shall adopt initial bylaws for the corporation.

The bylaws of a corporation may contain any provision for managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation that is not inconsistent with law or the articles of incorporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 2.06, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Articles of incorporation content, see § 79-4-2.02.

Power to amend bylaws, see § 79-4-302.

Copy of bylaws or restated bylaws and all amendments to them currently in effect to be maintained at corporation’s principal office, see § 79-4-16.01.

Construction and application of provisions of articles, bylaws, statutes, or agreements restricting alienation or transfer of corporate stock.
2 A.L.R.2d 745.

Construction and effect of corporate articles, charter, or bylaws limiting duration or maturity of its indebtedness. 55 A.L.R.2d 949.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 258 et seq.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:796-74:798, 74:984 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 244 et seq.

§79-4-2.07.
Emergency bylaws.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, the board of directors of a corporation may adopt bylaws to be effective only in an emergency defined in subsection (d). The emergency bylaws, which are subject to amendment or repeal by the shareholders, may make all provisions necessary for managing the corporation during the emergency, including:

Procedures for calling a meeting of the board of directors;

Quorum requirements for the meeting; and

Designation of additional or substitute directors.

All provisions of the regular bylaws consistent with the emergency bylaws remain effective during the emergency. The emergency bylaws are not effective after the emergency ends.

Corporate action taken in good faith in accordance with the emergency bylaws:

Binds the corporation; and

May not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee or agent.

An emergency exists for purposes of this section if a quorum of the corporation’s directors cannot readily be assembled because of some catastrophic event.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 207; Laws, 1988, ch. 368, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 18, 1988).

Articles of incorporation content, see § 79-4-2.02.

Emergency powers of board of directors of corporation, see § 79-4-3.03.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 1267.

§79-4-3.01.
Purposes.

Every corporation incorporated under Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. has the purpose of engaging in any lawful business unless a more limited purpose is set forth in the articles of incorporation.

A corporation engaging in a business that is subject to regulation under another statute of this state may incorporate under Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. only if permitted by, and subject to all limitations of the other statute.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 301, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

General powers of corporation, see § 79-4-3.02.

Applicability of this section to permissible corporate names, see § 79-4-4.01.

Applicability of statutes regulating sale of assets or property of corporation as affected by purpose or character of corporation.
9 A.L.R.2d 1306.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 164 et seq.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:191 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 21 et seq.

Holmes, The revised Model Business Corporation Act and corporate law reform in Mississippi.
57 Miss. L. J. 271, August, 1987.

§79-4-3.02.
General powers.

Unless its articles of incorporation provide otherwise, every corporation has perpetual duration and succession in its corporate name and has the same powers as an individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its business and affairs, including without limitation power:

To sue and be sued, complain and defend in its corporate name;

To have a corporate seal, which may be altered at will, and to use it, or a facsimile of it, by impressing or affixing it or in any other manner reproducing it;

To make and amend bylaws, not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation or with the laws of this state, for managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation;

To purchase, receive, lease or otherwise acquire, and own, hold, improve, use and otherwise deal with, real or personal property, or any legal or equitable interest in property, wherever located;

To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property;

To purchase, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire; own, hold, vote, use, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge or otherwise dispose of; and deal in and with shares or other interests in, or obligations of, any other entity;

To make contracts and guarantees, incur liabilities, borrow money, issue its notes, bonds and other obligations (which may be convertible into or include the option to purchase other securities of the corporation), and secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of any of its property, franchises or income, and make contracts of guaranty and suretyship which are necessary or convenient to the conduct, promotion or attainment of the business of (a) a corporation all of the outstanding stock of which is owned, directly or indirectly, by the contracting corporation, or (b) a corporation which owns, directly or indirectly, all of the outstanding stock of the contracting corporation, or (c) a corporation all of the outstanding stock of which is owned, directly or indirectly, by a corporation which owns, directly or indirectly, all of the outstanding stock of the contracting corporation, which contracts of guaranty and suretyship shall be deemed to be necessary or convenient to the conduct, promotion or attainment of the business of the contracting corporation, and make other contracts of guaranty and suretyship which are necessary or convenient to the conduct, promotion or attainment of the business of the contracting corporation;

To lend money, invest and reinvest its funds, and receive and hold real and personal property as security for repayment;

To be a promoter, partner, member, associate or manager of any partnership, joint venture, trust or other entity;

To conduct its business, locate offices and exercise the powers granted by Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. within or without this state;

To elect directors and appoint officers, employees and agents of the corporation, define their duties, fix their compensation and lend them money and credit;

To pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension trusts, profit sharing plans, share bonus plans, share option plans and benefit or incentive plans for any or all of its current or former directors, officers, employees and agents;

To make donations for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific or educational purposes;

To transact any lawful business that will aid governmental policy;

To make payments or donations, or do any other act, not inconsistent with law, that furthers the business and affairs of the corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 3.02; Laws, 1988, ch. 368, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 368, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

Gifts and donations by corporations for public welfare or charitable or educational purposes to be changed to operation expenses, see § 79-1-3.

Lack of necessity that articles of incorporation set forth any corporate powers enumerated in §§ 79-4-1.01 et seq., see § 79-4-2.02.

Disposition of assets not requiring shareholder apparel, see § 79-4-12.01.

Dissolution of corporation generally, see § 79-4-14.01 et seq.

General powers of corporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-151.

Just as a corporation’s negligent performance of contractual duties does not justify the disregard of the corporate entity, neither does the fact that the principal shareholder oversees the day-to-day operation. Gray v. Edgewater Landing, Inc., 541 So. 2d 1044, 1989 Miss. LEXIS 192 (Miss. 1989).

In a property damage case, because there was no authority cited for the proposition that an action filed on behalf of a dissolved corporation should have been treated as being filed against a partnership, appellate review of the issue was precluded. In addressing the merits of the issue, it was determined that a dissolved corporation could not have been a real party in interest because it had been dissolved more than eight years before the alleged incident took place, and there was an opportunity given to substitute the real party in interest. Funderburg v. Pontotoc Elec. Power Ass'n, 6 So.3d 439, 2009 Miss. App. LEXIS 159 (Miss. Ct. App. 2009).

Corporation has power to sue in corporate name only insofar as state grants that power, and when corporation is suspended it loses all rights acquired by form of organization. Where suspension had been set aside by time amended complaint was filed, and company was thus authorized to resume all activities as though suspension had not been imposed, claim that it lacked power to file suit was not applicable. Bryant Constr. Co. v. Cook Constr. Co., 518 So. 2d 625, 1987 Miss. LEXIS 2934 (Miss. 1987).

Corporation cannot delegate its duties to others with same freedom as individuals. Southern Electric Sec. Co. v. State, 91 Miss. 195, 44 So. 785, 1907 Miss. LEXIS 136 (Miss. 1907).

A corporation’s right to acquire and hold land, whether in violation of a charter or the laws or public policy of the state, can be questioned only by the state in which the land lies or the sovereignty from which the corporation received its charter. Federal Land Bank v. Cooper, 190 Miss. 490, 200 So. 729, 1941 Miss. LEXIS 73 (Miss. 1941).

Reservation in a deed to an individual by the Federal Land Bank of one-half of the mineral interest in the land conveyed thereby, whether in violation of this section [Code 1942, § 5329] or not, could only be questioned by the state and not by the grantee in such deed or those claiming through him. Federal Land Bank v. Cooper, 190 Miss. 490, 200 So. 729, 1941 Miss. LEXIS 73 (Miss. 1941).

Grantor of land sold to corporation could not attack its title under this section [Code 1942, § 5329]. Middleton v. Georgetown Mercantile Co., 117 Miss. 134, 77 So. 956, 1918 Miss. LEXIS 157 (Miss. 1918).

Corporation with power to acquire realty without limit as to value and quantity cannot be affected by this section [Code 1942, § 5329]. Southern Realty Co. v. Tchula Co-operative Stores, 114 Miss. 309, 75 So. 121, 1917 Miss. LEXIS 36 (Miss. 1917).

Corporation’s warranty of its right to cut timber from 16th section land, or that it would obtain such right held not void. Southern Plantations Co. v. Kennedy Heading Co., 104 Miss. 131, 61 So. 166, 1913 Miss. LEXIS 14 (Miss. 1913).

Corporation’s deed without seal will be enforced in equity. Southern Plantations Co. v. Kennedy Heading Co., 104 Miss. 131, 61 So. 166, 1913 Miss. LEXIS 14 (Miss. 1913).

Unsealed deed by corporation held not available in ejectment to support plaintiff’s title. Littelle v. Creek Lumber Co., 99 Miss. 241, 54 So. 841, 1911 Miss. LEXIS 199 (Miss. 1911).

In making a sale of its personal property a private corporation may act without seal; agency for the corporation in this case may be proved, and authority to act for it implied, as in the case of natural persons. Cary-Halidy Lumber Co. v. Cain, 70 Miss. 628, 13 So. 239, 1893 Miss. LEXIS 56 (Miss. 1893).

Corporation cannot give away its own assets to the prejudice of creditors, nor can it defeat creditors of another corporation by purchasing its assets unless it is a bona fide purchaser for value, in which case it is still liable for debts of selling corporation to the extent of assets received. Mahaffey Co. v. Russell & Butler, 100 Miss. 122, 54 So. 807, 1911 Miss. LEXIS 92 (Miss. 1911).

With an express enabling statute, the majority of the stockholders of an insolvent public corporation may sell all of its assets. Hinds County v. Natchez J. & C. R. Co., 85 Miss. 599, 38 So. 189, 1904 Miss. LEXIS 111 (Miss. 1904).

A corporation is not liable on contracts made by its promoters unless it adopts the same or receives their benefits. Bank of Forest v. Orgill Bros. & Co., 82 Miss. 81, 34 So. 325, 1903 Miss. LEXIS 157 (Miss. 1903).

The execution of a written contract by a corporation, apparently signed by its proper officers, need not be proved in a suit upon such contract unless such execution be denied on oath. Wanita Woolen Mills v. Rollins, 75 Miss. 253, 22 So. 819, 1897 Miss. LEXIS 112 (Miss. 1897).

Bank with authorized capital stock of $35,000 may by a majority vote of the stockholders, as provided for amendments, reduce its capital stock to $25,000. Perry v. Bank of Commerce, 116 Miss. 838, 77 So. 812, 1917 Miss. LEXIS 365 (Miss. 1917).

Such a reduction could do no injustice to a minority stockholder where he was to receive new stock equal in value to his old stock. Perry v. Bank of Commerce, 116 Miss. 838, 77 So. 812, 1917 Miss. LEXIS 365 (Miss. 1917).

Execution or endorsement of accommodation paper for the benefit of third persons is not within the authority of a corporation in the absence of special authorization so to do. Ketcham v. Mississippi Outdoor Displays, Inc., 203 Miss. 52, 33 So. 2d 300, 1948 Miss. LEXIS 231 (Miss. 1948).

Corporation with authority to operate mercantile business, borrow money, and receive and execute security therefor, can endorse a note. Gullege v. Woods, 108 Miss. 233, 66 So. 536, 1914 Miss. LEXIS 193 (Miss. 1914).

Where a warehouse company had no power to construct and maintain conduits across the street of a city and had contracted to furnish a railroad company with water through conduits, a subsequent agreement by which the railroad company having such power undertook to construct them is not an illegal evasion of the police power of the city. Mayor, etc., of Canton v. Canton Cotton Warehouse Co., 84 Miss. 268, 36 So. 266, 1904 Miss. LEXIS 39 (Miss. 1904).

A bona fide loan of money, jointly by a director and another to an insolvent corporation may be secured by a mortgage on the property of the corporation. Millsaps v. Chapman, 76 Miss. 942, 26 So. 369, 1899 Miss. LEXIS 29 (Miss. 1899).

Corporation’s warranty of its right to cut timber from 16th section land, or that it would obtain such right held not void. Southern Plantations Co. v. Kennedy Heading Co., 104 Miss. 131, 61 So. 166, 1913 Miss. LEXIS 14 (Miss. 1913).

Unsealed deed of corporation passes the equitable title. Hines v. Imperial Naval Store Co., 101 Miss. 802, 58 So. 650, 1911 Miss. LEXIS 176 (Miss. 1911).

The written appointment of a substituted trustee in a deed of trust executed by a corporation, the beneficiary in the deed, need not be under seal. Brown v. British American Mortg. Co., 86 Miss. 388, 38 So. 312, 1905 Miss. LEXIS 26 (Miss. 1905).

Law will not allow defense of ultra vires to defeat the ends of justice. National Surety Co. v. Hall-Miller Decorating Co., 104 Miss. 626, 61 So. 700, 1913 Miss. LEXIS 81 (Miss. 1913).

Corporation purchasing interest in another corporation from an individual cannot defeat payment of price by setting up that the transaction was ultra vires where it retains the property bought. Watts Mercantile Co. v. Buchanan, 92 Miss. 540, 46 So. 66, 1908 Miss. LEXIS 204 (Miss. 1908).

Agency and authority to act for corporation may be implied as in case of natural persons. Metzger v. Southern Bank, 98 Miss. 108, 54 So. 241, 1910 Miss. LEXIS 115 (Miss. 1910); Brown v. British American Mortg. Co., 86 Miss. 388, 38 So. 312, 1905 Miss. LEXIS 26 (Miss. 1905); Cary-Halidy Lumber Co. v. Cain, 70 Miss. 628, 13 So. 239, 1893 Miss. LEXIS 56 (Miss. 1893).

Corporation through acquiescence held estopped to claim it did not execute agreement signed by its president in his individual name, giving railroad license for a spur track over its land. Belzoni Oil Co. v. Yazoo & M. V. R. Co., 94 Miss. 58, 47 So. 468, 1908 Miss. LEXIS 6 (Miss. 1908).

Agency for the corporation in the case of a sale of its personal property without seal may be proved, and authority to act for it may be implied, as in the case of natural persons. Cary-Halidy Lumber Co. v. Cain, 70 Miss. 628, 13 So. 239, 1893 Miss. LEXIS 56 (Miss. 1893).

A resolution by the board of directors fixing the president’s salary, which resolution was passed when the president cast the deciding vote in his own favor, was voidable at the suit of minority stockholders who established that the salary was clearly excessive and wasteful as against them. Landstreet v. Meyer, 201 Miss. 826, 29 So. 2d 653, 1947 Miss. LEXIS 452 (Miss. 1947).

Corporate salary awards may not, over the objections of minority stockholders, be based on services already rendered and concluded. Landstreet v. Meyer, 201 Miss. 826, 29 So. 2d 653, 1947 Miss. LEXIS 452 (Miss. 1947).

Corporation’s estoppel in pais with respect to act of agent is governed by same principles as individuals. Metzger v. Southern Bank, 98 Miss. 108, 54 So. 241, 1910 Miss. LEXIS 115 (Miss. 1910).

Corporation through acquiescence held estopped to claim it did not execute agreement signed by its president in his individual name, giving railroad license for a spur track over its land. Belzoni Oil Co. v. Yazoo & M. V. R. Co., 94 Miss. 58, 47 So. 468, 1908 Miss. LEXIS 6 (Miss. 1908).

A corporation executing through one of its officers an accommodation note is not liable when so to do is beyond the scope of its corporate authority. Ketcham v. Mississippi Outdoor Displays, Inc., 203 Miss. 52, 33 So. 2d 300, 1948 Miss. LEXIS 231 (Miss. 1948).

Where defendant purchased lumber from corporation through S and gave him a check therefor, endorsement and collection of the check by S for the corporation constituted valid payment, though S afterwards misappropriated the proceeds. Perry v. Sumrall Lumber Co., 95 Miss. 691, 49 So. 263, 1909 Miss. LEXIS 272 (Miss. 1909).

A corporation is not liable on contracts made by its promoters unless it adopts the same or received their benefits. Bank of Forest v. Orgill Bros. & Co., 82 Miss. 81, 34 So. 325, 1903 Miss. LEXIS 157 (Miss. 1903).

Where there was an immediate necessity for the execution by a corporation of an assignment for the benefit of its creditors and it executed such an instrument, acting through a quorum of its board of directors in pursuance of directions of stockholders given at a meeting in which a majority of stock and stockholders were represented, the same is not void or voidable at the suit of creditors (none of the stockholders objecting thereto) because proper notice was not given of the meeting. State Nat'l Bank v. Duncan, 83 Miss. 610, 35 So. 569 (Miss. 1904).

An insolvent corporation which has ceased to be a going concern, and has no prospects of resuming business, cannot legally prefer a debt due to one of its directors, its secretary and its treasurer. King v. Wooldridge, 78 Miss. 179, 28 So. 824, 1900 Miss. LEXIS 94 (Miss. 1900).

An insolvent corporation may, in good faith, prefer creditors, but the directors of such a corporation cannot, by their own votes and acts, prefer themselves. Love Mfg. Co. v. Queen City Mfg. Co., 74 Miss. 290, 20 So. 146, 1896 Miss. LEXIS 103 (Miss. 1896).

The wife of the deceased owner of a corporation was not personally liable for its business debts under § 79-3-285 [Repealed] since there was no proof that she exercised control and management over the corporation, even though she was one of the corporation’s original directors, regularly received funds from the corporate account for her personal and household expenses, and performed services for the corporation. Flanagan v. Jackson Wholesale Bldg. Supply Co., 461 So. 2d 761, 1984 Miss. LEXIS 2061 (Miss. 1984).

Power of president of corporation to have litigation instituted by it where board of directors has failed or refused to grant permission.
10 A.L.R.2d 701.

Acts of employee, in procuring warrant or aiding prosecution, as within scope of employment so as to render employer liable for malicious prosecution. 18 A.L.R.2d 402.

Power of particular officer or agent of business corporation to bind it by a donation to a charity or similar institution.
50 A.L.R.2d 447.

Corporation’s power to enter into partnership or joint venture.
60 A.L.R.2d 917.

Statute denying defense of usury to corporation. 63 A.L.R.2d 924.

Duty and liability of closely held corporation, its directors, officers, or majority stockholders, in acquiring stock of minority shareholder.
7 A.L.R.3d 500.

Communications by corporation as privileged in stockholders’ action.
34 A.L.R.3d 1106.

Fire insurance on corporate property as affected by its intentional destruction by a corporate officer, employee, or stockholder. 37 A.L.R.3d 1385.

Similarity of ownership or control as basis for charging corporation acquiring assets of another with liability for former owner’s debts.
49 A.L.R.3d 881.

Criminal liability of corporation for bribery or conspiracy to bribe public official. 52 A.L.R.3d 1274.

Liability of director or dominant shareholder for enforcing debt legally owed him by corporation.
56 A.L.R.3d 212.

Power of corporation to make political contribution or expenditure under state law. 79 A.L.R.3d 491.

Application of statute denying access to courts or invalidating contracts where corporation fails to comply with regulatory statute as affected by compliance after commencement of action.
23 A.L.R.5th 744.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 75.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1715 et seq.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Form 43.1 (complaint, petition, or declaration – to collect on corporate debt – corporation the alter ego of individual).

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1018 et seq.

1984 Mississippi Supreme Court Review: Corporate, Contract and Commercial Law. 55 Miss. L. J. 65.

§79-4-3.03.
Emergency powers.

In anticipation of or during an emergency defined in subsection (d), the board of directors of a corporation may:

Modify lines of succession to accommodate the incapacity of any director, officer, employee or agent; and

Relocate the principal office, designate alternative principal offices or regional offices, or authorize the officers to do so.

During an emergency defined in subsection (d), unless emergency bylaws provide otherwise:

Notice of a meeting of the board of directors need be given only to those directors whom it is practicable to reach and may be given in any practicable manner, including by publication and radio; and

One or more officers of the corporation present at a meeting of the board of directors may be deemed to be directors for the meeting, in order of rank and within the same rank in order of seniority, as necessary to achieve a quorum.

Corporate action taken in good faith during an emergency under this section to further the ordinary business affairs of the corporation:

Binds the corporation; and

May not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee or agent.

An emergency exists for purposes of this section if a quorum of the corporation’s directors cannot readily be assembled because of some catastrophic event.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 3.03; Laws, 1988, ch. 368, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 18, 1988).

Emergency bylaws, see § 79-4-2.07.

Corporation’s exceeding or abusing authority conferred upon it by law as grounds for judicial dissolution of corporation, see § 79-4-14.30.

§79-4-3.04.
Ultra Vires.

Except as provided in subsection (b), the validity of corporate action may not be challenged on the ground that the corporation lacks or lacked power to act.

A corporation’s power to act may be challenged:

In a proceeding by a shareholder against the corporation to enjoin the act;

In a proceeding by the corporation, directly, derivatively or through a receiver, trustee or other legal representative, against an incumbent or former director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation; or

In a proceeding by the Attorney General under Section 79-4-14.30.

In a shareholder’s proceeding under subsection (b)(1) to enjoin an unauthorized corporate act, the court may enjoin or set aside the act, if equitable and if all affected persons are parties to the proceeding, and may award damages for loss (other than anticipated profits) suffered by the corporation or another party because of enjoining the unauthorized act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 3.04, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Corporation’s exceeding or abusing authority conferred upon it by law as grounds for judicial dissolution of corporation, see § 79-4-14.30.

Challenge to corporation’s power to act under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-155.

Defense of ultra vires raised by one party to contract against other party is prohibited by statute. Bryant Constr. Co. v. Cook Constr. Co., 518 So. 2d 625, 1987 Miss. LEXIS 2934 (Miss. 1987).

A corporation which accepts the benefits of a contract may not assert a defense of ultra vires in an action by the other party. Pendleton v. Williams, 198 So. 2d 235, 1967 Miss. LEXIS 1255 (Miss. 1967).

The principle that a stranger to the transaction, whose rights have not been invaded, may not collaterally attack the legality of action taken at a stockholders’ meeting on grounds of informality or irregularity in the meeting would seem to have been recognized by the legislature in the enactment of this section [Code 1942, §
North Mississippi Sav. & Loan Asso. v. Confederate States Sav. & Loan Asso., 250 Miss. 463, 166 So. 2d 119, 1964 Miss. LEXIS 475 (Miss. 1964).

Power of president of corporation to have litigation instituted by it where board of directors has failed or refused to grant permission.
10 A.L.R.2d 701.

Acts of employee in procuring warrant or aiding prosecution, as within scope of employment so as to render employer liable for malicious prosecution.
18 A.L.R.2d 402.

Validity of security for contemporaneous loan to corporation by officer, director, or stockholder.
31 A.L.R.2d 663.

Expenses incurred by competing factions within corporation in soliciting proxies as charged against corporation.
51 A.L.R.2d 873.

Corporation’s power to enter into partnership or joint venture.
60 A.L.R.2d 917.

Duty and liability of closely held corporation, its directors, officers, or majority stockholders, in acquiring stock of minority shareholder.
7 A.L.R.3d 500.

Communications by corporation as privileged in stockholders’ action.
34 A.L.R.3d 1106.